Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3986
Milk in farm bulk tanks; cooled; temperature.

Milk for manufacturing purposes in farm bulk tanks shall be cooled to forty degrees Fahrenheit or lower within two hours after milking and maintained at fifty degrees Fahrenheit or lower until transferred to the transport tank. Milk offered for sale for manufacturing purposes shall be in a farm bulk tank that meets all 3-A sanitary standards.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 12, p. 75;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.98;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 22;

Laws 1986, LB 900, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 268, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3922;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 22.